Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-246
School lands; leases; covenant required.

All leases executed after May 3, 1935, with respect to educational lands shall contain a covenant to the effect that no prairie lands shall be broken without written permission authorized by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 16, p. 609;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-223;

R.S.1943, § 72-246;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 41.